test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_bimisewanakid_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     bimisewanakid: bimisewanakid
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1bimisewanakid: nibimisewanakid
     +Px2bimisewanakid: gibimisewanakid
     +Px3bimisewanakid: obimisewanakid
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid: ibimisewanakid
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     bimisewanakid+Dim: bimisewanakidens
     bimisewanakid+Con: bimisewanakidenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     bimisewanakid+Pos: bimisewanakidim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     bimisewanakid+Pej: bimisewanakidish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl: bimisewanakidinaan
     bimisewanakid+PosPl: bimisewanakidiwaa
     bimisewanakid+PosObv: bimisewanakidini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     bimisewanakid+Pret: bimisewanakidiban
     bimisewanakid+VocPl: bimisewanakid***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     bimisewanakid+Obv: bimisewanakidan
     bimisewanakid+Pl: bimisewanakidag
     bimisewanakid+Loc: bimisewanakiding
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim: nibimisewanakidens
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con: nibimisewanakidenh
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim: gibimisewanakidens
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con: gibimisewanakidenh
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim: obimisewanakidens
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con: obimisewanakidenh
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim: ibimisewanakidens
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con: ibimisewanakidenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Pos: nibimisewanakidim
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Pos: gibimisewanakidim
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Pos: obimisewanakidim
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pos: ibimisewanakidim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Pej: nibimisewanakidish
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Pej: gibimisewanakidish
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Pej: obimisewanakidish
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej: ibimisewanakidish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl: nibimisewanakidinaan
     +Px1bimisewanakid+PosPl: nibimisewanakidiwaa
     +Px1bimisewanakid+PosObv: nibimisewanakidini
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl: gibimisewanakidinaan
     +Px2bimisewanakid+PosPl: gibimisewanakidiwaa
     +Px2bimisewanakid+PosObv: gibimisewanakidini
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl: obimisewanakidinaan
     +Px3bimisewanakid+PosPl: obimisewanakidiwaa
     +Px3bimisewanakid+PosObv: obimisewanakidini
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pos1Pl: ibimisewanakidinaan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+PosPl: ibimisewanakidiwaa
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+PosObv: ibimisewanakidini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Pret: nibimisewanakidiban
     +Px1bimisewanakid+VocPl: nibimisewanakid***idig, idog***
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Pret: gibimisewanakidiban
     +Px2bimisewanakid+VocPl: gibimisewanakid***idig, idog***
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Pret: obimisewanakidiban
     +Px3bimisewanakid+VocPl: obimisewanakid***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pret: ibimisewanakidiban
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+VocPl: ibimisewanakid***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Obv: nibimisewanakidan
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Pl: nibimisewanakidag
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Loc: nibimisewanakiding
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Obv: gibimisewanakidan
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Pl: gibimisewanakidag
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Loc: gibimisewanakiding
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Obv: obimisewanakidan
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Pl: obimisewanakidag
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Loc: obimisewanakiding
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Obv: ibimisewanakidan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pl: ibimisewanakidag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Loc: ibimisewanakiding
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos: bimisewanakidensim
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos: bimisewanakidenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej: bimisewanakidensish
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej: bimisewanakidenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl: bimisewanakidensinaan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl: bimisewanakidensiwaa
     bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv: bimisewanakidensini
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl: bimisewanakidenhinaan
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl: bimisewanakidenhiwaa
     bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv: bimisewanakidenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pret: bimisewanakidensiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+VocPl: bimisewanakidens***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pret: bimisewanakidenhiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+VocPl: bimisewanakidenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Obv: bimisewanakidensan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pl: bimisewanakidensag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Loc: bimisewanakidensing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Obv: bimisewanakidenhan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pl: bimisewanakidenhag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Loc: bimisewanakidenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej: bimisewanakidimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pos1Pl: bimisewanakidiminaan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosPl: bimisewanakidimiwaa
     bimisewanakid+Pos+PosObv: bimisewanakidimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pret: bimisewanakidimiban
     bimisewanakid+Pos+VocPl: bimisewanakidim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Obv: bimisewanakidiman
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pl: bimisewanakidimag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Loc: bimisewanakidiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     bimisewanakid+Pej+Pos1Pl: bimisewanakidishinaan
     bimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl: bimisewanakidishiwaa
     bimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv: bimisewanakidishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     bimisewanakid+Pej+Pret: bimisewanakidishiban
     bimisewanakid+Pej+VocPl: bimisewanakidish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pej+Obv: bimisewanakidishan
     bimisewanakid+Pej+Pl: bimisewanakidishag
     bimisewanakid+Pej+Loc: bimisewanakidishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidinaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidinaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidiniiban
     bimisewanakid+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidinaanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidinaanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidinaaning
     bimisewanakid+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidinian
     bimisewanakid+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidiniag
     bimisewanakid+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidibaning
     bimisewanakid+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakid***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakid***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakid***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos: nibimisewanakidensim
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Pos: nibimisewanakidenhim
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos: gibimisewanakidensim
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Pos: gibimisewanakidenhim
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos: obimisewanakidensim
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Pos: obimisewanakidenhim
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Pos: ibimisewanakidensim
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos: ibimisewanakidenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej: nibimisewanakidensish
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Pej: nibimisewanakidenhish
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej: gibimisewanakidensish
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Pej: gibimisewanakidenhish
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej: obimisewanakidensish
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Pej: obimisewanakidenhish
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Pej: ibimisewanakidensish
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pej: ibimisewanakidenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl: nibimisewanakidensinaan
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl: nibimisewanakidensiwaa
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv: nibimisewanakidensini
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl: nibimisewanakidenhinaan
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl: nibimisewanakidenhiwaa
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv: nibimisewanakidenhini
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl: gibimisewanakidensinaan
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl: gibimisewanakidensiwaa
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv: gibimisewanakidensini
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl: gibimisewanakidenhinaan
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl: gibimisewanakidenhiwaa
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv: gibimisewanakidenhini
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl: obimisewanakidensinaan
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl: obimisewanakidensiwaa
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv: obimisewanakidensini
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl: obimisewanakidenhinaan
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+PosPl: obimisewanakidenhiwaa
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+PosObv: obimisewanakidenhini
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Pos1Pl: ibimisewanakidensinaan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+PosPl: ibimisewanakidensiwaa
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+PosObv: ibimisewanakidensini
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos1Pl: ibimisewanakidenhinaan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+PosPl: ibimisewanakidenhiwaa
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+PosObv: ibimisewanakidenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Pret: nibimisewanakidensiban
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+VocPl: nibimisewanakidens***idig, idog***
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Pret: nibimisewanakidenhiban
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+VocPl: nibimisewanakidenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Pret: gibimisewanakidensiban
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+VocPl: gibimisewanakidens***idig, idog***
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Pret: gibimisewanakidenhiban
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+VocPl: gibimisewanakidenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Pret: obimisewanakidensiban
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+VocPl: obimisewanakidens***idig, idog***
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Pret: obimisewanakidenhiban
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+VocPl: obimisewanakidenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Pret: ibimisewanakidensiban
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+VocPl: ibimisewanakidens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pret: ibimisewanakidenhiban
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+VocPl: ibimisewanakidenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Obv: nibimisewanakidensan
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Pl: nibimisewanakidensag
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Dim+Loc: nibimisewanakidensing
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Obv: nibimisewanakidenhan
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Pl: nibimisewanakidenhag
     +Px1bimisewanakid+Con+Loc: nibimisewanakidenhing
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Obv: gibimisewanakidensan
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Pl: gibimisewanakidensag
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Dim+Loc: gibimisewanakidensing
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Obv: gibimisewanakidenhan
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Pl: gibimisewanakidenhag
     +Px2bimisewanakid+Con+Loc: gibimisewanakidenhing
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Obv: obimisewanakidensan
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Pl: obimisewanakidensag
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Dim+Loc: obimisewanakidensing
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Obv: obimisewanakidenhan
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Pl: obimisewanakidenhag
     +Px3bimisewanakid+Con+Loc: obimisewanakidenhing
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Obv: ibimisewanakidensan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Pl: ibimisewanakidensag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Dim+Loc: ibimisewanakidensing
